District of Columbia statutes.
3-1332

Aiding or abetting unauthorized bingo games, raffles, or Monte Carlo night parties; penalties.

No person shall aid or abet in the conduct of any bingo game, raffle, or Monte Carlo night party, except in accordance with a license duly issued and unsuspended or revoked by the Board. Any person convicted of violating this section shall be subject to a fine not to exceed $1,000 or imprisonment not to exceed 6 months, or both. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this section, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this section, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this section shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 406(a), 32 DCR 4450
Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-220, § 2(b)(5), 34 DCR 900
1981 Ed., § 2-2532.